Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201290-538
Cash Funds.

CASH
FUNDS.

The receipts for FY2011-12 and FY2012-13 inuring to the
several Cash Funds, together with any amounts held in account by the State
Treasurer on June 30, 2011, are hereby credited to each of the funds respectively.

Expenditure of Cash Funds appropriated in this act shall
be limited to the amount shown by program except when specific exceptions
are made. The amounts appropriated in this act include the following funds:

(1) Legislative Council: Nebraska Legislative Shared Information
System Cash Fund, Donations/Contributions Cash Fund, Nebraska Health Care
Cash Fund;

(2) Supreme Court: Supreme Court Reports Cash Fund, Probation
Program Cash Fund, Probation Cash Fund, State Probation Contractual Services
Cash Fund, Dispute Resolution Cash Fund, Counsel for Discipline Cash Fund,
Supreme Court Education Fund, Supreme Court Automation Cash Fund, Parenting
Act Fund;

(3) Governor: Governor's Policy Research Cash Fund;

(4) Secretary of State: Nebraska Collection Agency Fund,
Records Management Cash Fund, Secretary of State Administration Cash Fund,
Uniform Commercial Code Cash Fund, Corporation Cash Fund, Election Administration
Fund;

(5) Auditor of Public Accounts: Cooperative Audit Cash Fund;

(6) Attorney General: Motor Vehicle Fraud Cash Fund, Department
of Justice Natural Resources Enforcement Fund, State Settlement Cash Fund,
Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund, State DNA Sample and Data Base Fund, State
Medicaid Fraud Control Unit Cash Fund;

(7) State Treasurer: State Treasurer Administrative Fund,
Unclaimed Property Cash Fund, Mutual Finance Assistance Fund, College Savings
Plan Administrative Fund, College Savings Plan Expense Fund, Convention Center
Support Fund, State Disbursement Unit Cash Fund, Treasury Management Cash
Fund, Sports Arena Facility Support Fund;

(8) State Department of Education: State Department of Education
Cash Fund, Certification Fund, Professional Practices Commission Fund, Tax
Equity and Educational Opportunities Fund, Education Innovation Fund, School
Technology Fund, Tuition Recovery Cash Fund, Private Postsecondary Career
Schools Cash Fund, Excellence in Teaching Cash Fund, School District Reorganization
Fund;

(9) Public Service Commission: Nebraska Grain Warehouse
Surveillance Cash Fund, Nebraska Telecommunications Relay System Fund, Public
Service Commission Housing and Recreational Vehicle Cash Fund, Nebraska Telecommunications
Universal Service Fund, Nebraska Internet Enhancement Fund, Nebraska Competitive
Telephone Marketplace Fund, Enhanced Wireless 911 Fund, Moisture Testing Examination
Fund, Grain Warehouse Auditing Fund, Municipal Rate Negotiations Revolving
Loan Fund, Public Service Commission
Pipeline Regulation Fund;

(10) Department of Revenue: Department of Revenue Enforcement
Fund, State Lottery Operation Cash Fund, Marijuana and Controlled Substances
Tax Administration Cash Fund, Department of Revenue Contractor Enforcement
Fund, Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fees Collection Fund, Petroleum
Release Remedial Action Collection Fund, Litter Fee Collection Fund, Severance Tax Administration Fund, Department
of Revenue Miscellaneous Receipts Fund, Charitable Gaming Operations Fund,
Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund, Nebraska Incentives Fund, Motor
Fuel Tax Enforcement and Collection Cash Fund, Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund,
State Athletic Commissioner's Cash Fund, Department of Revenue Property Assessment
Division Cash Fund, Property Tax Credit Cash Fund, Energy Conservation Improvement
Fund, Nebraska Advantage Transformational Tourism and Redevelopment Act Cash
Fund;

(11) Department of Aeronautics: Department of Aeronautics
Cash Fund;

(12) Department of Agriculture: Fertilizers and Soil Conditioners
Administrative Fund, Commercial Feed Administration Cash Fund, Pure Milk Cash
Fund, Soil and Plant Analysis Laboratory Cash Fund, Livestock Auction Market
Fund, Nebraska Potato Development Fund, Graded Egg Fund, Weights and Measures
Administrative Fund, Nebraska Poultry and Egg Development, Utilization, and
Marketing Fund, Agricultural Products Marketing Information Cash Fund, Manufacturing
Milk Cash Fund, Pure Food Cash Fund, Nebraska Agricultural Products Marketing
Cash Fund, State Apiary Cash Fund, Pseudorabies Control Cash Fund, Weed Book
Cash Fund, Pesticide Administrative Cash Fund, Nebraska Seed Administrative
Cash Fund, Plant Protection and Plant Pest Cash Fund, Tractor Permit Cash
Fund, Nebraska Origin and Premium Quality Grain Cash Fund, Animal Damage Control
Cash Fund, Noxious Weed Cash Fund, Buffer Strip Incentive Fund, Winery and
Grape Producers Promotional Fund, Commercial Dog and Cat Operator Inspection
Program Cash Fund, Domesticated Cervine Animal Cash Fund, Anthrax Control
Act Cash Fund;

(13) Department of Banking and Finance: Financial Institution
Assessment Cash Fund, Securities Act Cash Fund, Banking Settlement Cash Fund;

(14) State Fire Marshal: Nebraska Natural Gas Pipeline Safety
Cash Fund, State Fire Marshal Cash Fund, Underground Storage Tank Fund, Training
Division Cash Fund, Reduced Cigarette Ignition Propensity Fund;

(15) Department of Insurance: Department of Insurance Cash
Fund;

(16) Department of Labor: Employment Security Special Contingent
Fund, Farm Labor Contractors Fund, Contractor Registration Cash
Fund, Boiler Inspection Cash Fund, Mechanical Safety Inspection
Fund, Professional Employer Organization Cash Fund;

(17) Department of Motor Vehicles: Motor Carrier Division
Cash Fund, Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund, License Plate Cash Fund,
Motorcycle Safety Education Fund;

(18) Department of Health and Human Services: Health and
Human Services Cash Fund, Veterans' Home Building Fund, Institution Cash Fund,
Small Business Enterprises Cash Fund, School District Reimbursement Fund,
Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund, Nebraska Child Abuse Prevention Fund,
Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund, Children's Health Insurance Cash Fund, Childhood
Care Cash Fund, University of Nebraska Medical Center Medical Education Revolving
Fund, Behavioral Health Services Fund, Health and Human Services Reimbursement
Fund, Professional and Occupational Credentialing Cash Fund, Rural Health
Professional Incentive Fund, Organ and Tissue Donor Awareness and Education
Fund, Tobacco Prevention and Control Cash Fund, Stem Cell Research Cash Fund;

(19) Department of Roads: Highway Cash Fund, Grade Crossing
Protection Fund, State Recreation Road Fund, Roads Operations Cash Fund, Midwest
Interstate Passenger Rail Compact Cash Fund, Light-Density Rail Line Assistance
Cash Fund;

(20) Department of Veterans' Affairs: Veteran Cemetery Construction
Fund, Nebraska Veteran Cemetery System Operation Fund;

(21) Department of Natural Resources: Water Resources Cash
Fund, Republican River Basin Water Sustainability Task Force Cash Fund, Small
Watersheds Flood Control Fund, Nebraska Resources Development Fund, Nebraska
Soil and Water Conservation Fund, Natural Resources Water Quality Fund, Water
Well Decommissioning Fund, Carbon Sequestration Assessment Cash Fund, Water
Resources Trust Fund, Department of Natural Resources Cash Fund;

(22) State Electrical Board: Electrical Division Fund;

(23) Military Department: Military Department Cash Fund,
Governor's Emergency Cash Fund, Nebraska Emergency Management Agency Cash
Fund, Nebraska Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Cash Fund, Joint
Operations Center Cash Fund;

(24) Board of Educational Lands and Funds: Surveyors' Cash
Fund, Board of Educational Lands and Funds Cash Fund, Survey Record Repository
Fund;

(25) Game and Parks Commission: State Game Fund, State Park
Cash Revolving Fund, Nebraska Habitat Fund, Nebraska Aquatic Habitat Fund,
Nebraska Snowmobile Trail Cash Fund, Nebraska Outdoor Recreation Development
Cash Fund, Wildlife Conservation Fund, Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund,
Cowboy Trail Fund, Game Law Investigation Cash Fund, Niobrara Council Fund,
Nebraska Environmental Endowment Fund, Ferguson House Fund;

(26) Nebraska Library Commission: Nebraska Library Commission
Cash Fund;

(27) Nebraska Liquor Control Commission: Nebraska Liquor
Control Commission Rule and Regulation Cash Fund;

(28) State Racing Commission: Racing Commission's Cash Fund,
Track Distribution Fund;

(29) Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court: Compensation
Court Cash Fund;

(30) Nebraska Brand Committee: Nebraska Brand Inspection
and Theft Prevention Fund;

(31) Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Board: Nebraska
Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Fund;

(32) State Real Estate Commission: State Real Estate Commission's
Fund;

(33) Board of Barber Examiners: Board of Barber Examiners
Fund;

(34) Department of Correctional Services: Department of
Correctional Services Facility Cash Fund, Parole Program Cash Fund, Reentry
Cash Fund;

(35) Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Commission:
State Educational Telecommunications Fund, NEB*SAT Cash Fund;

(36) Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education:
Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education Cash Fund, Nebraska Opportunity
Grant Fund;

(37) Nebraska State Colleges: Chadron Cash Fund, Peru Cash
Fund, Wayne Cash Fund, Chadron State College Designated Cash Fund, Peru State
College Designated Cash Fund, Wayne State College Designated Cash Fund, Board
of Trustees Cash Fund;

(38) University of Nebraska: University Cash Fund, Temporary
University Fund, University of Nebraska at Omaha Cash Fund, University of
Nebraska Medical Center Cash Fund, University of Nebraska at Kearney Cash
Fund, University of Nebraska Central Administration Designated Cash Fund,
University of Nebraska-Lincoln Designated Cash Fund, University of Nebraska
at Omaha Designated Cash Fund, University of Nebraska Medical Center Designated
Cash Fund, University of Nebraska at Kearney Designated Cash Fund;

(39) Nebraska State Fair Board: Antique Farm Machinery and
Equipment Fund;

(40) Real Property Appraiser Board: Real Property Appraiser
Fund;

(41) Nebraska State Historical Society: Historical Society
Fund, Historical Landmark Cash Fund;

(42) Nebraska Wheat Development, Utilization, and Marketing
Board: Nebraska Wheat Development, Utilization, and Marketing Fund;

(43) Nebraska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission: Oil and
Gas Conservation Fund;

(44) Board of Engineers and Architects: Engineers and Architects
Regulation Fund;

(45) Board of Geologists: Geologists Regulation Fund;

(46) Nebraska Ethanol Board: Agricultural Alcohol Fuel Tax
Fund, Ethanol Production Incentive Cash Fund;

(47) Nebraska Dairy Industry Development Board: Nebraska
Dairy Industry Development Fund;

(48) State Board of Examiners for Land Surveyors: Land Surveyor
Examiner's Fund;

(49) Nebraska State Board of Public Accountancy: Certified
Public Accountants Fund;

(50) Nebraska State Patrol: Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund,
Investigation Petty Cash Fund, Carrier Enforcement Cash Fund, Nebraska State
Patrol Drug Control and Education Cash Fund, Public Safety Cash Fund, Nebraska
State Patrol Vehicle Replacement Cash Fund, Nebraska Public Safety Communication
System Cash Fund;

(51) Department of Administrative Services: Building Renewal
Allocation Fund, State Building Renewal Assessment Fund, University Building
Renewal Assessment Fund, State College Building Renewal Assessment Fund, Capitol
Restoration Cash Fund, Vacant Building and Excess Land Cash Fund, Resource
Recovery Fund, Tort Claims Fund, Information Technology Infrastructure Fund,
Health and Life Benefit Administration Cash Fund, City of the Primary Class
Development Fund, City of the Metropolitan Class Development Fund, World Day
on the Mall Cash Fund;

(52) Abstracters Board of Examiners: Abstracters Board of
Examiners Cash Fund;

(53) Commission on Latino-Americans: Hispanic Awareness
Cash Fund, Commission on Latino-Americans Cash Fund;

(54) Nebraska Arts Council: Nebraska Arts Council Cash Fund,
Nebraska Arts and Humanities Cash Fund;

(55) State Foster Care Review Board: Foster Care Review
Board Cash Fund;

(56) Foster Care Review
Office: Foster Care Review Office Cash Fund;

(57) Nebraska Energy Office: School Weatherization
Fund, State Energy Office Cash Fund;

(58) Department of Economic
Development: Nebraska Agricultural Products Research Fund, Aerospace Museum
Cash Fund, Job Training Cash Fund, Administrative Cash Fund, Affordable
Housing Trust Fund, Comprehensive Housing Strategy Cash Fund, Economic Development
Cash Fund, Civic and Community Center
Financing Fund;

(59) State Board of Landscape
Architects: State Board of Landscape Architects Cash Fund;

(60) Nebraska Power Review
Board: Nebraska Power Review Fund;

(61) Nebraska Investment Council:
State Investment Officer's Cash Fund;

(62) Nebraska Commission on
Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice: Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center
Cash Fund, Law Enforcement Improvement Fund, Victim's Compensation Fund, Community
Corrections Uniform Data Analysis Cash Fund, Violence Prevention Cash Fund,
Nebraska Crime Victim Fund;

(63) Commission for the Blind
and Visually Impaired: Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired Cash
Fund;

(64) Commission for the Deaf
and Hard of Hearing: Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing Fund;

(65) Department of Environmental
Quality: Integrated Solid Waste Management Cash Fund, Nebraska Litter Reduction
and Recycling Fund, Department of Environmental Quality Cash Fund, Chemigation
Costs Fund, Low-Level Radioactive Waste Cash Fund, Petroleum Products and
Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Fund, Petroleum Release Remedial
Action Cash Fund, Wastewater Treatment Operator Certification Cash Fund, Local
Site Selection Cash Fund, Local Monitoring Committee Cash Fund, Waste Reduction
and Recycling Incentive Fund, Wastewater Treatment Facilities Construction
Loan Fund, Remedial Action Plan Monitoring Fund, Livestock Waste Management
Cash Fund, Drinking Water Administration Fund, Clean Air Title V Cash Fund,
Air Quality Permit Cash Fund, Superfund Cost Share Cash Fund, Private Onsite
Wastewater Treatment System Certification and Registration Cash Fund, Solid
Waste Landfill Closure Assistance Fund;

(66) Public Employees Retirement
Board: School Expense Fund, Judges Expense Fund, State Patrol Expense Fund,
Deferred Compensation Expense Fund, State Employees Retirement System Expense
Fund, County Employees Retirement System Expense Fund, State Employer Retirement
Expense Fund, County Employer Retirement Expense Fund, State Cash Balance
Expense Fund, County Cash Balance Expense Fund;

(67) Dry Bean Commission:
Dry Bean Development, Utilization, Promotion, and Education Fund;

(68) Nebraska Accountability
and Disclosure Commission: Nebraska Accountability and Disclosure Commission
Cash Fund, Campaign Finance Limitation Cash Fund;

(69) Corn Development, Utilization,
and Marketing Board: Nebraska Corn Development, Utilization, and Marketing
Fund;

(70) Community College Aid:
Nebraska Community College Aid Cash Fund;

(71) Nebraska Tourism
Commission: State Visitors Promotion Cash Fund;

(72) Grain Sorghum Development, Utilization,
and Marketing Board: Grain Sorghum Development, Utilization, and Marketing
Fund;

(73) Tax Equalization and
Review Commission: Tax Equalization and Review Commission Cash Fund;

(74) Commission on Public
Advocacy: Commission on Public Advocacy Operations Cash Fund, Legal Aid and
Services Fund, Civil Legal Services Fund; and

(75) Commission on Indian
Affairs: Designated Collection Fund.

Laws 2012, LB968, § 65;

Laws 2012, LB998A, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB1053A, § 2.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB968, section 65, with LB998A, section 2, and LB1053A, section 2, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB968 became effective April 3, 2012. Changes made by LB998A and LB1053A became operative July 1, 2012.